assignments/hw2/submission/turkish.xfst
! Submission by Berk Özbalcı.

! Consonsants, vowels, vowel features, etc.
define Vowel a | e | i | o | u | ü | ö | ı ;
define Cons  b | c | ç | d | f | g | ğ | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | ş | t | v | y | z ;
define Lang   [Vowel | Cons] ;
define +high  i | u | ı | ü ;
define +low   a | ö ;
define +back  ı | a | o | u ;
define +round ö | ü | o | u ;
define -high  [Vowel - %+high]  ;
define -low   [Vowel - %+low]   ;
define -back  [Vowel - %+back]  ;
define -round [Vowel - %+round] ;

! Roots.
define ROOT  {ev}
           | {araba}
           | {adam}
           | {fasulye}
           | {bamya}
           | {enginar}
           ;

! Suffix forms.
define RPlu %+Plu -> l A r ;
define RLoc %+Loc -> d A ;
define RGen %+Gen -> NG I n ;
define RKi  %+Ki  -> k i N ;

! Phonological rules.
define RA A -> %-high & %-round & %-back || %-back Cons* _ ,,
          A -> %-high & %-round & %+back || %+back Cons* _ ;

define RI I -> %+high & %+round & %+back || [%+round & %+back] Cons* _ ,,
          I -> %+high & %+round & %-back || [%+round & %-back] Cons* _ ,,
          I -> %+high & %-round & %+back || [%-round & %+back] Cons* _ ,,
          I -> %+high & %-round & %-back || [%-round & %-back] Cons* _ ;

define RNG NG -> 0 || Cons _ ,,
           NG -> n || Vowel _ ;

define RN N -> n || _ %+Loc ,,
          N -> 0 || _ \%+Loc , _ .#.;

! Morphotactic machine (yeah).
define MAIN ROOT [ %+Plu | [ %+Loc | %+Gen | %+Plu [ %+Loc | %+Gen ] ]
                           [ %+Ki [ %+Loc | %+Gen | %+Plu [ %+Loc | %+Gen ] ] ] *
                           [ %+Ki [ %+Plu | %+Loc | %+Gen | %+Plu [ %+Loc | %+Gen ] ] | 0 | %+Ki ]
                         | %+Loc | %+Gen | %+Plu [ %+Loc | %+Gen ] ] | ROOT ;

read regex MAIN
       .o. RPlu .o. RGen .o. RLoc .o. RKi
       .o. RN .o. RNG .o. RA .o. RI .o. RA
       ;
